Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Assistance for Community Health Facilities.

Sec. 18.25.070.
Department to render assistance.

The department may assist in the purchase, construction, repair, and equipping of facilities to improve and protect community health, and may provide financial assistance for the operation of the facilities in case of operational deficits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 117 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For scope, see 7 AAC 13, art. 1.

Sec. 18.25.080.
Intent and purpose.

It is the intent of AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

to assist communities and areas in developing and improving health service facilities by the purchase, construction, renovation, or establishment of hospitals, health centers, or clinics, or quarters for personnel, and the purchase of furnishings, supplies, and equipment and making the other expenditures necessary to carry out the purpose of AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

.
Assistance is to be given in areas that would otherwise be denied adequate facilities, because the taxable values are limited in scope and an attempt at total community financing of a project would cause hardship or prevent its realization.
It is also intended that the department utilize the money authorized under AS 18.25.070 — 18.25.110 so far as can be arranged to assist municipalities in matching funds with the federal government under federal law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 117 SLA 1951)

Sec. 18.25.090.
Use of purchases.

Purchases under AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

are to be used for the purpose for which appropriated and when the purpose is discontinued the items shall be returned to the department for use elsewhere.

History.

(§ 3 ch 117 SLA 1951)

Sec. 18.25.100.
Regulations authorized.

The department shall adopt regulations for

the establishment of criteria, minimum requirements, and standards for assistance to communities under AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

;

the establishment of the fiscal and accounting procedures and controls considered necessary for the payment of grants;

the compilation of data and information from the communities concerned that will support the need for assistance under AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

;

the establishment of procedures by which communities may apply for assistance;

accepting financial or other assistance from the federal government under federal law to carry out the purpose of AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

through matching funds or grants;

cooperation and coordination with other state boards, departments, or agencies engaged in construction programs in areas applying for assistance under AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 117 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For scope, see 7 AAC 13, art. 1.

For minimum requirements, see 7 AAC 13, art. 2.

For standards for operation of a community health facility, see 7 AAC 13, art. 3.

For patient rights, see 7 AAC 13, art. 4.

For grant programs, see 7 AAC 78.

For grant services for individuals, see 7 AAC 81.

Sec. 18.25.110.
Report of grants made.

Within 10 days of the convening of each legislative session, the department shall have completed a report of grants made under AS

18.25.070

—

18.25.110

and notified the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 5 ch 117 SLA 1951; am § 27 ch 21 SLA 1995)